enhu2.foma
define HarmRuleJPy §JPy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowelwithyy | ConsJaje ] %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §JPy§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ ,,
                 §JPy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §JPy§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ ConsAe | Vowel1exc ]  %^ ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPJ §JP§ -> j || .#. \"^"*  %^  ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPJ1 §JPJ§ -> j || .#. \"^"*  %^  ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPnull §JP§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"*  %^  ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPnull1 §JPnull§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"*  %^  ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPmagas §JPmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel1 | ConsJaje | Cons y ] %^ ?* _ .o.
                 §JPmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* ConsAeJaje %^ ?* _ ,,
                 §JPmagas§ -> j || .#. \"^"* Consrd %^ ?* _ ,,
                 §JPmagas§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* [ Vowel y | ConsAeJaje | ConsAe | Vowel1exc ] %^ ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleai §AE§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ \j* _ .o.
                  §AE§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* %^ \%^* _ .o.
                  §AE§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons* %^ \%^* _ ;
define HarmRuleaiyi §AEyi§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithyy %^ \%^* \j _ .o.
                  §AEyi§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel Cons* %^ \%^* _ .o.
                  §AEyi§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* %^ \%^* _ ;
define HarmRuleaimagas §AEmagas§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?* \j* _ .o.
                  §AEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons* "^" ?* j* _ .o.
                  §AEmagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* [ ó | á | é | ő | ű | i | í ] "^" ?* j  _ ;
define HarmRuleaimely §AE22§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* Vowel %^ \j* _ .o.
#bakelitaim barátaim cukkiniaim nem jó!
                 §AE22§ -> a // .#. \"^"* Vowel Cons+ "^" ?* j*  _ .o.   
#cukkinijaim  hajójaim            
                 §AE22§ -> a // .#. \"^"* [ ó | á | é | ő | ű | i | í ] "^" ?* j  _ ;
# fii fiai fijai
define HarmRuleaimelyfi §AE221§ -> a || .#. ?* j _ .o.
                 §AE221§ -> 0 // .#. ?* \j _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2 §OEOE2§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE2§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2magas §OEOE2magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE2magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleaitok2mely §OEOE22§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE22§ -> o // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define Suffixb   §b§ -> 0 // b b [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §b§ -> b // \[ b b ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define Suffixh   §h§ -> 0 // h h [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §h§ -> h // \[ h h ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define Suffixk   §k§ -> 0 // k k [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §k§ -> k // \[ k k ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define Suffixn   §n§ -> 0 // n n [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §n§ -> n // \[ n n ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define SuffixNNn   §NNn§ -> %- n // n n [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §NNn§ -> n // \[ n n ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define Suffixr   §r§ -> 0 // r r [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §r§ -> r // \[ r r ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define SuffixRRr   §RRr§ -> %- r // r r [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §RRr§ -> r // \[ r r ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;
define Suffixt   §t§ -> 0 // t t  [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §t§ -> t // \[ t t ] [ %^ | 0 ]  _ ;



define ToUpCase [a:A|á:Á|b:B|c:C|d:D|e:E|é:É|f:F|g:G|h:H|i:I|í:Í|j:J|k:K|l:L|m:M|n:N|o:O|ó:Ó|ö:Ö|ő:Ő|p:P|q:Q|r:R|s:S|t:T|u:U|ú:Ú|ü:Ü|ű:Ű|v:V|w:W|x:X|y:Y|z:Z] ?* | ?* ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup      "^"        -> 0;
define CleanupEndings  "^" "+" {cDis}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEss}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSoc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTem}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPlur}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFam}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGenpl} -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGens}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAbl}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cnAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAde}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCau}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDat}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDel}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEla}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFac}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFor}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccForp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cxForpen}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIne}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIns}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNom}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSub}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSue}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSup}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTer}  -> 0;

define ItoY   G h i c z i -> G h y c z y ,,
              C z i n k -> C z y n k ,,
              I b l  -> Y b l ;


echo ">>> read in enhu2 <<<"                    
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/noun/enhu2.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon           .o. 
               Etoee             .o. 
               Atoaa             .o. 
               Changez2          .o.
               HarmRulejaje      .o. 
               CleanupEndings    .o.
               Suffixb           .o. 
               Suffixh           .o. 
               Suffixk           .o. 
               Suffixn           .o. 
               Suffixr           .o. 
               Suffixt           .o. 
               HarmRulePlur      .o. 
               HarmRuleJ         .o. 
               HarmRuleJnull1         .o. 
               HarmRuleul        .o. 
               HarmRuleuk        .o. 
               HarmRuleenkent    .o. 
               HarmRuleestul     .o. 
               HarmRuleunk       .o. 
               HarmRuleotok1     .o. 
               HarmRuleotok2     .o. 
               HarmRuleJP        .o. 
               HarmRuleJPnull1        .o. 
               HarmRuleai        .o. 
               HarmRuleaitok2    .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc       .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc1      .o. 
               HarmRuletol       .o. 
               HarmRuleAAA       .o. 
               HarmRulehoz       .o. 
               HarmRuleVV        .o. 
               HarmRuleAA        .o. 
               HarmRuleonen      .o. 
               Cleanup           .o.
               ToUpCase;

echo ">>> read in enhujaje <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/noun/enhujaje.lexc
define Lexiconjaje

define Grammarjaje Lexiconjaje           .o. 
               Etoee             .o. 
               Atoaa             .o. 
               Changez2          .o.
               HarmRulejaje      .o. 
               CleanupEndings    .o.
               Suffixb           .o. 
               Suffixh           .o. 
               Suffixk           .o. 
               Suffixn           .o. 
               Suffixr           .o. 
               Suffixt           .o. 
               HarmRulePlur      .o. 
               HarmRuleJJ        .o. 
               HarmRuleul        .o. 
               HarmRuleuk        .o. 
               HarmRuleenkent    .o. 
               HarmRuleestul     .o. 
               HarmRuleunk       .o. 
               HarmRuleotok1     .o. 
               HarmRuleotok2     .o. 
               HarmRuleJPJ       .o. 
               HarmRuleai        .o. 
               HarmRuleaitok2    .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc       .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc1      .o. 
               HarmRuletol       .o. 
               HarmRuleAAA       .o. 
               HarmRulehoz       .o. 
               HarmRuleAA        .o. 
               HarmRuleAAX        .o. 
               HarmRuleVV        .o. 
               HarmRuleonen      .o. 
               Cleanup           .o.
               ToUpCase;

echo ">>> read in enhuszulo <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/noun/enhuszulo.lexc
define Lexiconszulo

define Grammarszulo Lexiconszulo .o. 
               Etoee             .o. 
               Atoaa             .o. 
               Changez2          .o.
               HarmRulejaje      .o. 
               CleanupEndings    .o.
               Suffixk           .o. 
               HarmRulePlur      .o. 
               HarmRuleJJ        .o. 
               HarmRuleul        .o. 
               HarmRuleuk        .o. 
               HarmRuleenkent    .o. 
               HarmRuleestul     .o. 
               HarmRuleunk       .o. 
               HarmRuleotok1     .o. 
               HarmRuleotok2     .o. 
               HarmRuleJPnull    .o. 
               HarmRuleai        .o. 
               HarmRuleaitok2    .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc       .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc1      .o. 
               HarmRuletol       .o. 
               HarmRuleAAA       .o. 
               HarmRulehoz       .o. 
               HarmRuleVV        .o. 
               HarmRuleAA        .o. 
               HarmRuleonenoe    .o. 
               Cleanup           .o.
               ToUpCase;

echo ">>> read in enhule <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/noun/enhule.lexc
define Lexiconle

define Grammarle Lexiconle       .o. 
               Etoee             .o. 
               Atoaa             .o. 
               Changez2          .o.
               HarmRulejaje      .o. 
               CleanupEndings    .o.
               Suffixk           .o. 
               HarmRulePluroa    .o. 
               HarmRuleJ         .o. 
               HarmRuleJnull1    .o. 
               HarmRuleul        .o. 
               HarmRuleuk        .o. 
               HarmRuleenkentoa  .o. 
               HarmRuleestuloa   .o. 
               HarmRuleunk       .o. 
               HarmRuleotok1oa   .o. 
               HarmRuleotok2     .o. 
               HarmRuleJP        .o. 
               HarmRuleJPnull1   .o. 
               HarmRuleai        .o. 
               HarmRuleaitok2    .o. 
               HarmRuleAccoa     .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc1      .o. 
               HarmRuletol       .o. 
               HarmRuleAAA       .o. 
               HarmRulehoz       .o. 
               HarmRuleVV        .o. 
               HarmRuleAA        .o. 
               HarmRuleonen      .o. 
               Cleanup           .o.
               ToUpCase;

echo ">>> read in enhuero <<<"
read lexc /home/en/program/foma/tktest/lexc/noun/enhuero.lexc
define Lexiconero
